src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
These proper nouns are in essence partly assimilated loan word as foreign words with stressed last syllable are assimilated to sami by (often adapting the stressed syllable vowel, and) adding an unstressed syllable consisting of adapted (or if necesarry added) consonants and ending on vowel a (Morén-Duollja 2014). Proper nouns are only partly assimilated in that the stressed syllable vowel is not adapted in any way, neither are consonats inserted, only the final "a" remains. These proper nouns therefore work like regular a-stem nouns and get an even syllable case marking.

Words in lexicon NYSTØ end on vowel, no cg. Non-assimilated stems

LEXICON NYSTØ-fem  Femal names

* Britney # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Britney:* `Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Britneyav:* `Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc`
* *Britneyaj:* `Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Britneyas:* `Britney+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON NYSTØ-mal  Male name

* Taneli # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Taneli:* `Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Taneliav:* `Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc`
* *Taneliaj:* `Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Tanelias:* `Taneli+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON NYSTØ-obj  Objects

* Infiniti # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Infiniti:* `Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Infinitiav:* `Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc`
* *Infinitiaj:* `Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Infinitias:* `Infiniti+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON NYSTØ-org   Organizations

* Kulturby # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Kulturby:* `Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Kulturbyav:* `Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc`
* *Kulturbyaj:* `Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Kulturbyas:* `Kulturby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-org  Organizations loan

* Sameby # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Sameby:* `Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Samebyaj:* `Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Samebyas:* `Sameby+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

LEXICON NYSTØ-sur  Sur names

* Sandoz # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Sandoz:* `Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Sandozav:* `Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc`
* *Sandozaj:* `Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Sandozas:* `Sandoz+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

* Teigmo # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Teigmo:* `Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Teigmoav:* `Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Teigmoaj:* `Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Teigmoas:* `Teigmo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc  Place names loan

* Bodø # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Bodø:* `Bodø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Bodøaj:* `Bodø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Bodøas:* `Bodø+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc  Place names

* Borgå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Borgå:* `Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Borgåav:* `Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Borgåaj:* `Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Borgåas:* `Borgå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON NYSTØ_MWE-plc  Place names

Words in DUBAI lexicon end on vowel+vowel and have no cg. Last syllable is stressed. Get even syllable case marking. Non-assimilated stems. Not sure if this lexicon is necessary, at least for smj's sake.

LEXICON DUBAI-fem  I-final names. No cg. Female names

* Mai  # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Mai:* `Mai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Maiaj:* `Mai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Maias:* `Mai+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DUBAI-obj  I-final names. No cg. Object names

* Hyundai  # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Hyundai:* `Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Hyundaiaj:* `Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Hyundaias:* `Hyundai+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DUBAI-org  Organizations

* Khoi # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Khoi:* `Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Khoiaj:* `Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Khoias:* `Khoi+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DUBAI-mal  Male names

* Kublai # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Kublai:* `Kublai+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Kublaiaj:* `Kublai+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Kublaias:* `Kublai+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DUBAI-sur  Surnames

* Maarthai # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Maarthai:* `Maarthai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Maarthaiaj:* `Maarthai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Maarthaias:* `Maarthai+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DUBAI-plc  Place names

* Madurai # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Madurai:* `Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Maduraiaj:* `Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Maduraias:* `Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *maduraiak:* `Madurai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom`

Words in lexicon BERN end on conconant, no cg, even syllable case marking with -av, -aj, -as, etc. Last syllable is stressed. Both assimilated and non-assmilated stems.

LEXICON BERN-ani   Animals

* Lillemor # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Lillemor:* `Lillemor+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom`
* *Lillemoraj:* `Lillemor+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill`
* *Lillemoras:* `Lillemor+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-mal   Male names

* Eystein # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Eystein:* `Eystein+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Eysteinaj:* `Eystein+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Eysteinas:* `Eystein+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-surmal   name that are both sur- and male names

* Pipin # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Pipin:* `Pipin+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Pipinaj:* `Pipin+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Pipinas:* `Pipin+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-fem   Female name

* Ragnfrid # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Ragnfrid:* `Ragnfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Ragnfridaj:* `Ragnfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Ragnfridas:* `Ragnfrid+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.

LEXICON BERN-sur  Surnames

* Lind # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Lind:* `Lind+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Lindaj:* `Lind+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Lindas:* `Lind+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-plc  Placenames

* Beijing # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Beijing:* `Beijing+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Beijingaj:* `Beijing+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Beijingas:* `Beijing+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN_MWE-plc  Placenames

LEXICON BERN-objsur   Names used as both objects and surnames. 

* Stenbukk # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Stenbukk:* `Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Stenbukkaj:* `Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Stenbukkas:* `Stenbukk+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-orgsur  Names used for both organizations and surnames. 

* Nord # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Nord:* `Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Nordaj:* `Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Nordas:* `Nord+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-obj  Objects. Obs: Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.

* Sult # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Sult:* `Sult+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Sultaj:* `Sult+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Sultas:* `Sult+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-org  Organizations

* Laks # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Laks:* `Laks+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Laksaj:* `Laks+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Laksas:* `Laks+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org  Organizations loan.  

* Reinsamelag # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Reinsamelag:* `Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Reinsamelagaj:* `Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Reinsamelagas:* `Reinsamelag+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc  Placenames loan. 

* Mehamn # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Mehamn:* `Mehamn+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Mehamnaj:* `Mehamn+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Mehamnas:* `Mehamn+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj  Objects loan. 

* Verneplan # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Verneplan:* `Verneplan+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Verneplanaj:* `Verneplan+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language)
* ★*Verneplanas:* `Verneplan+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language)

Different lexicon for names that are both surnames and places.

Lexicons OY work as BERN lexicons

Words in LONDONBERN are sent to both LONDON and BERN lexicons. Non-assmilated stems.

4-syllable stems

Words in lexicon BASUDIS are trisyllabic in sg nom, and work like standard 4-syllable nouns. End on conconant and have cg. Even syllable case marking with acc -áv, ill -áj, ela -ás, etc. Real lule sami stems.

LEXICON BASUDIS-org  Only singular. Placenames

LEXICON BASUDIS-mal   Male names

* Ájluhasj # 4-syllable test examples:*
* *Ájluhasj:* `Ájluhasj+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Ájluhadtjaj:* `Ájluhasj+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill` (Eng. !should add dummy to prevent unusual dtj-stem?)
* *Ájluhattjas:* `Ájluhasj+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BASUDIS-plc  Place names

* Ulldevis # 4-syllable test examples:*
* *Ulldevis:* `Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Ulldevissaj:* `Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Ulldevisás:* `Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

Plurals

Words in lexicon VARGGAT even-syllable sámi plurals .

LEXICON VARGGAT-plc   Plural stems, sáme names.  Place names

LEXICON VARGGAT-org   Plural stems, sáme names. 

* Bieva #  test examples:*
* ★*Bievva:* `Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)
* *Bieva:* `Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom`
* *Bievajda:* `Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill`
* *Bievajs:* `Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela`

Words in lexicon ALEUHTAT even-syllables assimilated plurals.

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-plc  Plural names, not sami names. like -váre, -gårtje

## Odd syllable case marking

Words in lexicon LONDON end on conconant, no cg, case marking with -av, -ij, -is, etc. Last syllable is unstressed. Gets a regular odd syllable case marking. Both real lule sami stems, assimilated stems and non-assimilated stems

LEXICON LONDON-sur  Odd-syllable. Surnames. Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:%>is

* Åstot # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Åstot:* `Åstot+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Åstodij:* `Åstot+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Åstodis:* `Åstot+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-ani  Animals

* Jubmel # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Jubmel:* `Jubmel+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom`
* *Jubmelij:* `Jubmel+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill`
* *Jubmelis:* `Jubmel+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-org   Only singular Organizations

* Klassekampen # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Klassekampen:* `Klassekampen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Klassekampenij:* `Klassekampen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Klassekampenis:* `Klassekampen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-mal  Male names

* Mátteus # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Matteus:* `Matteus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Matteusij:* `Matteus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Matteusis:* `Matteus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-malsur  Names that can be both male- and surnames. Not used in smj-propernouns

* Timeus # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Timeus:* `Timeus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Timeusij:* `Timeus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Timeusis:* `Timeus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-fem  Female names

* Luhták # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Luhták:* `Luhták+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Luhtágij:* `Luhták+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Luhtágis:* `Luhták+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-malfem  Names that can be both male and female names.Not used in smj-propernouns

* Robin # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Robin:* `Robin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Robinij:* `Robin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Robinis:* `Robin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-malplc  Names that can be both male- and placenames.Not used in smj-propernouns

* Jergol # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Jergol:* `Jergol+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Jergolij:* `Jergol+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Jergolis:* `Jergol+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LONDON-plc  Only singular. Placenames

* Njierek # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Njierek:* `Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Njieregij:* `Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Njieregis:* `Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TJIERREK-plc  Only singular. Placenames. Without cg. Same as LONDON, but does not get Sem/Sur tag, not usuall for SMJ place names to become surnames. 
